Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 10 Division of Workforce Services Law
Subchapter 10
— Unemployment Trust Fund Financing Act of 2011

Effective Dates.

Acts 2011, No. 1125, § 2: Apr. 4, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the state's unemployment trust fund faces higher claim levels and longer benefit durations; that the state is in debt to the federal government for unemployment funds paid to citizens of this state; and that this act is immediately necessary because the state needs to create a revenue stream to begin to pay off the debt to the federal government. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-10-1001. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and cited as the “Unemployment Trust Fund Financing Act of 2011”.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1125, §
1.

11-10-1002. Legislative findings and intent.

The General Assembly finds that:

With a recession or economic slowdown now underway, the state's unemployment trust fund faces higher claims levels and longer benefit durations that accompany any economic downturn;

The Arkansas Unemployment Trust Fund:

Provides partial wage replacement to workers who find themselves out of work;

Provides economic stability for a community when major unemployment occurs; and

Encourages workers to remain in the community and to be available for work recalls by employers;

The state is in debt to the federal government for unemployment funds paid to citizens of the State of Arkansas; and

The bonds should be payable from revenues raised by an unemployment obligation assessment.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1125, §
1.

11-10-1003. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Authority” means the Arkansas Development Finance Authority;

“Bonds” means the “Arkansas Unemployment Trust Fund Bonds”, as authorized in this subchapter;

“Debt service” means all amounts required for the payment of principal, interest, and premium, if any, due with respect to the bonds in any fiscal year along with all associated costs, including the fees and costs of paying agents and trustees, remarketing agent fees, credit enhancement costs, and other amounts necessary in connection with the bonds;

“Designated revenues” means revenues derived from the unemployment obligation assessment under § 11-10-1017;

“Employer” means the same as under § 11-10-209;

“Federal interest rate” means at the time an issue of bonds is sold, the weighted average interest rate charged on advances from the federal trust fund under Title XII of the Social Security Act; and

“Federal Unemployment Trust Fund debt” means the principal and interest on advances from the federal trust fund under Title XII of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1321, as it existed on January 1, 2011.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1125, §
1.

11-10-1004. Authorization — Purposes.

The Arkansas Development Finance Authority is authorized, subject to the approval of the voters in a statewide election, to issue bonds to be known as the Arkansas Unemployment Trust Fund Bonds in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000).

The purpose of the bond issuance shall be to:

Repay the principal of and interest on advances from the federal trust fund under Title XII of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1321;

Pay the costs of issuance of the bonds including without limitation the costs of bond insurance or other credit enhancement;

Pay unemployment benefits by depositing bond proceeds into the Unemployment Compensation Fund;

Provide a debt service reserve; and

Pay capitalized interest on the bonds for a period not to exceed two (2) years.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1125, §
1.

11-10-1005. Governor’s proclamation.

The Arkansas Development Finance Authority shall prepare and distribute to the Governor a report that shall contain a plan for repaying the federal Unemployment Trust Fund debt and the estimated time and cost to repay the debt.

Upon receipt of the report described in subsection (a) of this section, the Governor shall, if the Governor deems it to be in the public interest, by proclamation call an election on the question of issuing the bonds.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1125, §
1.

11-10-1006. Election.

Arkansas Unemployment Trust Fund Bonds shall not be issued under this subchapter unless the issuance of bonds has been approved by a majority of the qualified electors of the state voting on the question at a statewide election called by proclamation of the Governor as provided under § 11-10-1005.

An election under this section may be in conjunction with a general election, or it may be a special election.

A special election held under this section shall occur on the second Tuesday of any month, except as otherwise provided for in this subsection.

A special election that is held in months in which a presidential preferential primary election, preferential primary election, general primary election, or general election is scheduled to occur shall be held on the date of the presidential preferential primary election, preferential primary election, general primary election, or general election.

If a special election is held on the date of the presidential preferential primary election, preferential primary election, or general primary election, the issue or issues to be voted upon at the special election shall be included on the ballot of each political party.

However, separate ballots containing only the issue or issues to be voted upon at the special election shall be prepared and made available to voters requesting a separate ballot.

A voter shall not be required to vote in a political party's presidential preferential primary election, preferential primary election, or general primary election in order to be able to vote in the special election.

Special elections scheduled to occur in a month in which the second Tuesday is a legal holiday shall be held on the third Tuesday of the month.

Notice of the election shall be:

Published by the Secretary of State in a newspaper of general circulation in the state at least thirty (30) days prior to the election; and

Mailed to each county board of election commissioners and the sheriff of each county at least sixty (60) days prior to the election.

The notice of election shall state that the election is to be held for the purpose of submitting to the people the following proposition in substantially the following form:

33.5% if the aggregate principal amount of bonds issued is $400,000,001 to $450,000,000; and

37.5% if the aggregate principal amount of bonds issued is $450,000,001 to $500,000,000.”

Each county board of election commissioners shall hold and conduct the election and may take any action with respect to the appointment of election officials and other matters as required by the laws of the state.

The vote shall be canvassed and the result of the vote declared in each county by the board.

Within ten (10) days after the date of the election, the results shall be certified by the boards to the Secretary of State, who shall tabulate all returns received and certify to the Governor the total vote for and against the proposition submitted pursuant to this subchapter.

The result of the election shall be proclaimed by the Governor by the publication of a proclamation one (1) time in a newspaper of general circulation in the State of Arkansas.

The results as proclaimed shall be conclusive unless a complaint challenging the proclaimed results is filed in Pulaski County Circuit Court within thirty (30) days after the date of the publication.

If a majority of the qualified electors voting on the proposition vote in favor of the proposition, the Arkansas Development Finance Authority shall proceed with the issuance of the bonds in the manner and on the terms set forth in this subchapter.

If a majority of the qualified electors voting on the proposition vote against the issuance of the bonds, the Arkansas Development Finance Authority shall have no authority to issue bonds.

Subsequent elections may be called by the Governor if the proposition fails, but each such subsequent election may be held no earlier than six (6) months after the date of the preceding election.

“Authorizing the Arkansas Development Finance Authority to issue Arkansas Unemployment Trust Fund Bonds (the ‘Bonds’) in a total principal amount not to exceed five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000). If approved, the bonds may be issued in one (1) or more series for the purpose of repaying the principal of and interest on advances from the federal trust fund under Title XII of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1321, paying the costs of issuance of the bonds including without limitation the costs of bond insurance or other credit enhancement, paying unemployment benefits by depositing bond proceeds into the Unemployment Compensation Fund, providing a debt service reserve, and paying capitalized interest on the bonds for a period not to exceed two (2) years.

The bonds shall be payable from certain designated revenues. Under the Unemployment Trust Fund Financing Act of 2011, (‘the Bond Act’), the bonds will be repaid from an unemployment obligation assessment imposed on employers. The bonds shall be issued under the authority of and the terms set forth in the Bond Act.

The unemployment obligation assessment shall be based on the aggregate principal amount of bonds issued for nonrefunding purposes and shall be determined by multiplying the employer's contribution rate in effect on the date that the Governor issues a proclamation calling an election on the issuance of the bonds for employers with accounts as of such date and the employer's contribution rate as of the employer's liability date for employers establishing accounts after the date of the proclamation by:

(a)

25% if the aggregate principal amount of bonds issued is $350,000,000 or less;

(b)

30% if the aggregate principal amount of bonds issued is $350,000,001 to $400,000,000;

(c)

The ballot title shall be “Issuance of Arkansas Unemployment Trust Fund Bonds, and levy and pledge of an unemployment obligation assessment”. On each ballot there shall be printed the title, the proposition set forth in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, and the following:

“FOR issuance of Arkansas Unemployment Trust Fund Bonds in an amount not to exceed $500,000,000, and levy and pledge of an unemployment obligation assessment
[ ]”

“AGAINST issuance of Arkansas Unemployment Trust Fund Bonds in an amount not to exceed $500,000,000, and levy and pledge of an unemployment obligation assessment
[ ]”

(d)

The notice and ballot shall contain a definition of “employer's contribution rate” as described in §§ 11-10-704 and 11-10-705.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1125, §
1.

11-10-1007. Procedure for issuing Arkansas Unemployment Trust Fund Bonds.

Prior to the issuance of Arkansas Unemployment Trust Fund Bonds, the Arkansas Development Finance Authority shall adopt a resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds.

Each resolution adopted under this section shall contain the terms, covenants, and conditions as are deemed desirable and consistent with this subchapter, including without limitation those pertaining to:

The establishment and maintenance of funds and accounts;

The deposit and investment of the bond proceeds; and

The rights and obligations of the state, its officers and officials, the Arkansas Development Finance Authority, and the registered owners of the bonds.

The resolutions of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority may provide for the execution and delivery by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority of a trust indenture or trust indentures, with one (1) or more banks or trust companies located within or without the state, containing any of the terms, covenants, and conditions required under subsection (b) of this section and any other terms and conditions deemed necessary by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority.

The trust indenture or trust indentures shall be binding upon the Arkansas Development Finance Authority and the state, and their respective officers and officials.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1125, §
1.

11-10-1008. Terms of bonds.

The Arkansas Unemployment Trust Fund Bonds are subject to the following terms and conditions:

The bonds may be issued in more than one (1) series in an amount sufficient to accomplish the purposes of this subchapter.

The respective series of bonds shall be designated by the year in which the bonds are issued.

If one (1) or more series of bonds is to be issued in a particular year, the series shall be designated alphabetically;

The bonds shall have the date or dates as the Arkansas Development Finance Authority determines.

The bonds shall mature or be subject to mandatory sinking fund redemption over a period ending not later than twelve (12) years after the date of issue of the bonds.

Refunding bonds issued under § 11-10-1013 shall mature or be subject to mandatory sinking fund redemption over a period not ending later than twelve (12) years after the date of issue of the original bonds;

The bonds shall bear interest at the rate or rates determined by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority at the sale of the bonds.

The bonds may bear interest at either a fixed or a variable rate or may be convertible from one (1) interest rate mode to another.

The interest shall be payable at the times as the Arkansas Development Finance Authority shall determine.

The true interest cost of an issue of bonds after taking into account original issue discount and premium and underwriter's discount shall not exceed the federal interest rate;

The bonds shall be issued in the form of bonds registered as to both principal and interest without coupons;

The Arkansas Development Finance Authority shall determine:

The denominations of the bonds;

Whether the bonds may be made exchangeable for bonds of another form or denomination bearing the same rate of interest;

When the bonds may be made payable and the places within or without the state where the bonds may be payable;

Whether the bonds may be made subject to redemption prior to maturity and the manner of and prices for redemption; and

Any other terms and conditions; and

Each bond shall be executed with the facsimile or manual signatures of the Chair and Secretary of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority and shall have affixed or imprinted thereon the seal of the state.

Delivery of the bonds executed shall be valid notwithstanding any change in the persons holding the offices occurring after the bonds have been executed.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1125, §
1.

11-10-1009. Sale of bonds.

The Arkansas Unemployment Trust Fund Bonds may be sold in any manner, either at private or public sale, and upon terms as the Arkansas Development Finance Authority shall determine to be reasonable and expedient for effecting the purposes of this subchapter.

If the bonds are to be sold at public sale, the Arkansas Development Finance Authority shall give notice of the offering of the bonds in a manner reasonably designed to notify participants in the public finance industry that such offering is being made.

The Arkansas Development Finance Authority shall set the terms and conditions of bidding, including the basis on which the winning bid will be selected.

The Arkansas Development Finance Authority may structure the sale of bonds utilizing financing techniques that are recommended by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority's professional advisors in order to take advantage of market conditions and obtain the most favorable interest rates consistent with the purposes of this subchapter.

The Arkansas Development Finance Authority may enter into any ancillary agreements in connection with the sale of the bonds as the Arkansas Development Finance Authority deems necessary and advisable, including without limitation bond purchase agreements, remarketing agreements, and letter of credit and reimbursement agreements.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1125, §
1.

11-10-1010. Employment of professionals.

Under § 15-5-212, the Arkansas Development Finance Authority may employ and retain any professionals that the Arkansas Development Finance Authority deems necessary to accomplish the issuance and sale of the Arkansas Unemployment Trust Fund Bonds, including without limitation legal counsel, financial advisors, underwriters, trustees, paying agents, and remarketing agents.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1125, §
1.

11-10-1011. Sources of repayment.

The Arkansas Unemployment Trust Fund Bonds shall be payable from the designated revenues.

The unemployment obligation assessment shall be collected until the end of the quarter immediately following the repayment of all bonds authorized under this subchapter.

The unemployment obligation assessment shall not be collected until the qualified voters of the state approve the issuance of bonds under this subchapter.

In order to secure the payment of debt service, any trust instrument, resolution, or other document for the security for the bondholders may provide for the payment of the designated revenues directly into a trust fund or to a paying agent for the payment of debt service on the bonds.

It is not necessary for the funds to be deposited into the State Treasury.

Designated revenues remaining after the payment of scheduled debt service on the bonds in any year shall be used to redeem or purchase outstanding bonds.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1125, §
1.

11-10-1012. Investment of proceeds.

Proceeds from the sale of the bonds shall be deposited into trust funds or accounts established under the resolution or trust indenture authorizing or securing the bonds to accomplish the purposes of this subchapter in amounts or portions as set forth in the resolution or trust indenture securing the bonds.

The holder of the trust funds shall establish separate accounts for the bonds.

In addition and under the resolution or trust indenture authorizing or securing the bonds, there may be created other funds, accounts, or subaccounts as the Arkansas Development Finance Authority may determine to be necessary or desirable to accomplish the purposes of this subchapter.

All procedures and methods for application of proceeds of the bonds shall be developed in consultation with the Arkansas Development Finance Authority, set forth in the resolution or trust indenture authorizing or securing the bonds, and maintained as part of the records of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority.

The holder and administrator of funds, composed, in whole or in part, of proceeds of bonds or disbursement from funds established under this subchapter, shall be required by appropriate provision of the resolution or trust indenture authorizing or securing the bonds issued to assist the Arkansas Development Finance Authority in preparing any report related to the bonds that may be required by this subchapter or other applicable federal or state law.

Proceeds from the sale of the bonds and any money held in any funds created under or authorized by this subchapter may be invested and reinvested in accordance with the resolution or trust indenture authorizing or securing the bonds issued and shall be invested by or at the direction of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority to the fullest extent practicable pending disbursement for the purposes intended in any of the following:

Direct obligations of the United States, including obligations issued or held in book entry form on the books of the United States Department of the Treasury, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by the United States;

Bonds, debentures, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness issued or guaranteed by any United States government agency if the obligations are backed by the full faith and credit of the United States;

Nonfull-faith and credit senior debt obligations issued or guaranteed by United States government agencies;

Money market funds investing exclusively in the investments described in subdivisions (e)(1)–(3) of this section;

Certificates of deposit providing for deposits secured at all times by collateral described in subdivisions (e)(1)–(3) of this section.

The certificates must be issued by commercial bank deposits that are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and collateral of which must be held by a third party.

The holder of the trust funds must have a perfected first security interest in the collateral;

Certificates of deposit, savings accounts, deposit accounts, or money market deposits, all of which are fully insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation;

Bonds or notes issued by the State of Arkansas, any municipality, county, or school district in the state or by any agency or instrumentality of the state;

Investment agreements with financial institutions or insurance companies that are rated in one (1) of the two (2) highest-rating categories of a nationally recognized rating agency;

Repurchase agreements providing for the transfer of securities from a dealer bank or securities firm to the holder of the trust funds and the transfer of cash from the holder of the trust funds to the dealer bank or securities firm with an agreement that the dealer bank or securities firm will repay the cash plus a yield to the holder of the trust funds in exchange for the securities at a specified date.

Repurchase agreements shall satisfy the following criteria:

Repurchase agreements must be between the holder of the trust funds and a dealer bank or securities firm described as follows:

Dealers with at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in capital; or

Banks whose deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation; and

The written repurchase agreement contract must include the following:

Securities that are acceptable for transfer are those listed in subdivisions (e)(1)–(3) of this section;

The term of the repurchase agreement may not exceed thirty (30) calendar days;

The collateral must be delivered to the holder of the trust funds, a trustee if a trustee is not supplying the collateral, or a third party acting as agent for the trustee if the trustee is supplying the collateral before or simultaneously with payment; and

The securities must be valued weekly, marked-to-market at current market price plus accrued interest.

(A) The value of collateral must be equal to one hundred three percent (103%) of the amount of cash transferred by the holder of the trust funds to the dealer bank or security firm under the repurchase agreement plus accrued interest.

Any other investment authorized by law.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1125, §
1.

11-10-1013. Refunding bonds.

The Arkansas Development Finance Authority may issue the Arkansas Unemployment Trust Fund Bonds for the purpose of refunding bonds previously issued under this subchapter if the total amount of bonds outstanding after the refunding is completed does not exceed the total amount authorized by this subchapter.

To the extent that refunding bonds are issued and the principal amount of the refunding bonds is not in a greater principal amount than the outstanding principal amount of the bonds being refunded, the principal amount of the refunding bonds shall not be subject to the five-hundred-million-dollar limit.

If the refunding bonds are issued in a greater principal amount than the bonds being refunded, the principal amount of the refunding bonds shall not count against the five-hundred-million-dollar limit so long as the aggregate debt service on the refunding bonds is less than the aggregate debt service on the bonds being refunded.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1125, §
1.

11-10-1014. Liability.

Officers, officials, employees, and members of the Board of Directors of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority are not liable personally for any reason arising from the issuance of bonds under this subchapter unless he or she acts with corrupt intent.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1125, §
1.

11-10-1015. Tax exemption.

All Arkansas Unemployment Trust Fund Bonds issued under this subchapter and interest on the bonds shall be exempt from all taxes of the State of Arkansas, including income, inheritance, and property taxes.

The bonds shall be eligible to secure deposits of all public funds and shall be legal for investment of municipal, county, bank, fiduciary, insurance company, and trust funds.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1125, §
1.

11-10-1016. Bonds — Rights and liabilities — Enforcement.

This subchapter shall constitute a contract between the State of Arkansas and the registered owners of all State of Arkansas Unemployment Trust Fund Bonds issued under this subchapter that shall never be impaired.

A violation of terms of this subchapter, whether under purported legislative authority or otherwise, shall be enjoined by the courts at the suit of any bondholder or of any taxpayer.

The courts in a suit against the Arkansas Development Finance Authority, or other appropriate officer or official of this state shall prevent a diversion of any revenues pledged under this subchapter and shall compel the restoration of diverted revenues by injunction or mandamus.

Without limitation as to any other appropriate remedy at law or in equity, any bondholder by an appropriate action, including without limitation, injunction or mandamus, may compel the performance of all covenants and obligations of the State of Arkansas and its officers and officials under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1125, §
1.

11-10-1017. Unemployment obligation assessment.

Except employers that have made an election to reimburse the Unemployment Compensation Fund under § 11-10-713(c), each employer shall pay a separate and additional assessment, to be known as the “unemployment obligation assessment”, on wages paid by that employer with respect to employment in addition to the contributions, stabilization and extended benefits taxes, and advance interest taxes levied under §§ 11-10-703 — 11-10-708.

The unemployment obligation assessment shall be based on the aggregate principal amount of bonds issued for nonrefunding purposes and shall be determined by multiplying the employer's contribution rate as described in §§ 11-10-704 and 11-10-705 and in effect on the date that the Governor issues a proclamation calling an election on the issuance of the bonds for employers with accounts as of such date and in effect as of the employer's liability date for employers establishing accounts after the date of the proclamation, by:

Twenty-five percent (25%) if the aggregate principal amount of bonds issued is three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000) or less;

Thirty percent (30%) if the aggregate principal amount of bonds issued is three hundred fifty million one dollars ($350,000,001) to four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000);

Thirty-three and five-tenths percent (33.5%) if the aggregate principal amount of bonds issued is four hundred million one dollars ($400,000,001) to four hundred fifty million dollars ($450,000,000); and

Thirty-seven and five-tenths percent (37.5%) if the aggregate principal amount of bonds issued is four hundred fifty million one dollars ($450,000,001) to five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000).

The effective date of the unemployment obligation assessment shall be the first day of the calendar quarter immediately following the month in which the Secretary of State certifies the vote of the voters approving the unemployment obligation assessment and the issuance of the bonds under this subchapter.

The unemployment obligation assessment is effective until the end of the quarter immediately following the repayment of all bonds authorized under this subchapter.

This unemployment obligation assessment shall not be credited to the separate account of any employer.

The unemployment obligation assessment shall be levied and collected in the same manner as contributions and shall be subject to the same penalty and interest, collection, impoundment, priority, lien, certificate of assessment, and assessment provisions and procedures under §§ 11-10-716 — 11-10-722.

Receipts from the unemployment obligation assessment and any penalty and interest on the unemployment obligation assessment shall be deposited into the Unemployment Compensation Fund Clearing Account.

At least once each month, deposits of the unemployment obligation assessment payment and any interest and penalty payments applicable to the unemployment obligation assessment shall be deposited into the Division of Workforce Services' Bond Financing Trust Fund.

Debt service on the bonds shall be paid in a timely manner and shall not be paid directly or indirectly by an equivalent reduction in unemployment contributions or taxes imposed under:

Sections 11-10-701 — 11-10-715; or

Section 11-10-801 et seq.

The unemployment obligation assessment may be used to:

Repay the principal of and interest on advances from the federal trust fund under Title XII of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1321;

Pay the costs of issuance of the bonds, including without limitation the costs of bond insurance or other credit enhancement;

Pay unemployment benefits by depositing bond proceeds into the Unemployment Compensation Fund;

Provide a debt service reserve; and

Pay capitalized interest on the bonds for a period not to exceed two (2) years.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall promulgate rules to carry out the provisions of this section.

Upon retirement of all bonds, the following shall be transferred to the Unemployment Compensation Fund:

Surplus unemployment obligation assessment collections; and

Delinquent taxes, penalties, or interest due under the unemployment obligation assessment.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1125, §
1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 323, 324.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Workforce Services' Bond Financing Trust Fund” for “Department of Workforce Services Bond Financing Trust Fund” in (b)(2); and substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (e).

11-10-1018. Division of Workforce Services — Bond Financing Trust Fund.

There is established on the books of the Division of Workforce Services a special restricted fund to be known as the “Bond Financing Trust Fund”, to be maintained and administered by the division under this subchapter for the purposes stated in this subchapter.

The following shall be deposited into the Bond Financing Trust Fund:

Collections of the unemployment obligation assessment; and

Any penalties and interest with respect to the unemployment obligation assessment.

Moneys in the Bond Financing Trust Fund may be used to:

Pay debt service on the bonds;

Make refunds of the unemployment obligation assessment and interest and penalty payments that were erroneously paid;

Return moneys to the Unemployment Compensation Fund Clearing Account that may have been incorrectly identified and erroneously transferred to the Bond Financing Trust Fund; and

Purchase or redeem outstanding bonds.

The division shall maintain the Bond Financing Trust Fund at the Arkansas Development Finance Authority or at one (1) or more financial institutions within or outside the state.

Income from investment of moneys in the Bond Financing Trust Fund shall be deposited into and credited to the Bond Financing Trust Fund.

All moneys received for, deposited into, or paid to the division for deposit into the Bond Financing Trust Fund:

Are specifically declared to be cash funds restricted in their use;

Shall not be deposited into the State Treasury for the purposes of:

Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 29;

Arkansas Constitution, Article 16, § 12;

Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 20; or

Any other constitutional provision or statutory law; and

Shall be held and applied by the division and the Arkansas Development Finance Authority as agent for the division solely for the uses set forth in this subchapter.

Interest and other moneys received from the investment of moneys in the Bond Financing Trust Fund are cash funds restricted in their use and shall not be deposited into the State Treasury but shall be held and applied by the division and the Arkansas Development Finance Authority as agent for the division solely for the uses set forth in this subchapter.

Upon retirement of all bonds, the following shall be transferred to the Unemployment Compensation Fund:

Surplus unemployment obligation assessment collections; and

Delinquent taxes, penalties, or interest due under the unemployment obligation assessment.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1125, §
1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 325-327.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.